Colorado, session 2026A, SB064.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-1.2-102, add (5.5)
as follows:
35-1.2-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 1.2, unless the context otherwise requires:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(5.5) "ELIGIBLE ENTITY" MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(a) IS CERTIFIED BY THE DIVISION OF CONSERVATION PURSUANT TO
SECTION 12-15-104; OR
(b) (I) (A) IS A DISTRICT THAT HAS AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT WATER
ACTIVITIES, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN SECTION 37-45.1-102; OR
(B) IS AN IRRIGATION DISTRICT CREATED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 41,
45, 46, 47, 48, OR 50 OF TITLE 37 OR A DITCH AND RESERVOIR COMPANY
CREATED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 42 OF TITLE 7; AND
(II) HAS A LETTER OF SUPPORT, IN A FORM APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSIONER, FROM AN ENTITY THAT IS CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION
12-15-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-1.2-103, amend
(6)(a), (7) introductory portion, (7)(b)(II), (7)(c)(VII) introductory portion,
and (7)(c)(VII)(F); and add (7)(d) as follows:
35-1.2-103. Colorado agricultural future loan program - created
- application - criteria - awards - rules.
(6) The department shall review applications received pursuant to
this section. In awarding grants and distributing money to financial entities
for awarding loans, the department shall:
(a) Ensure applicants approved for loans or grants meet the
requirements for eligible businesses, ELIGIBLE ENTITIES, and eligible
farmers or ranchers pursuant to section 35-1.2-102 (5), (5.5), and (6); and
(7) Pursuant to article 4 of title 24, the commissioner shall
promulgate ADOPT such rules as are required in this article 1.2 and such
additional rules as may be necessary to implement the loan program. At a
minimum, the rules must:
(b) On and after January 1, 2023, to the extent practicable, prioritize
the provision of loans to eligible farmers or ranchers who apply for loans
or grants from the loan program and who:
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-064

(II) Represent a population that is underserved or underrepresented
in Colorado agriculture; and
(c) Specify:
(VII) Permissible uses of money awarded as low-interest loans to
eligible farmers or ranchers, ELIGIBLE ENTITIES, and eligible businesses,
which uses may include:
(F) Such other uses as the commissioner may identify; AND
(d) PRIORITIZE THE PROVISION OF LOANS TO ELIGIBLE ENTITIES THAT
APPLY FOR LOANS TO ACQUIRE AND CONSERVE AGRICULTURALLY
PRODUCTIVE LAND AND THAT SEEK TO TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OF THE LAND
TO AN ELIGIBLE FARMER OR RANCHER WHO QUALIFIES FOR A LOAN
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(b)(I) OR (7)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-064

(2) This act applies to applications submitted on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-064